Maryland, session 2026, HB0270.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Human Services
7–302.
(a) There is a Maryland Commission on Caregiving in the Department.
7–303.
(a) (1) The Commission consists of the following members:
(i) one member of the Senate of Maryland, appointed by the
President of the Senate;
(ii) one member of the House of Delegates, appointed by the Speaker
of the House; and
(iii) the following members appointed by the Governor:
1. two representatives from the Department of Human
Services;
2. three representatives from the Maryland Department of
Health;
3. one representative from the Department of Aging;

HOUSE BILL 270 3
4. one representative from an area agency on aging;
5. one representative from the Department of Disabilities;
6. one representative from the Maryland Respite Care
Coalition;
7. two consumers of respite care services;
8. three family caregivers; [and]
9. three representatives of organizations that provide or
have interest or expertise in respite care services; AND
10. ONE FAMILY CAREGIVER OF A SERVICE–DISABLED
VETERAN.
Article – State Government
9–914.
(a) The powers and duties of the Trust shall rest in and be exercised by a Board
of Trustees.
(b) The Board of Trustees shall consist of the following 12 members:
(1) the Secretary, ex officio, or the Secretary’s designee, who shall serve as
the chair;
(2) the Secretary of Aging, ex officio, or the Secretary’s designee;
(3) the Secretary of Labor, ex officio, or the Secretary’s designee;
(4) the Secretary of Health, ex officio, or the Secretary’s designee;
(5) the Secretary of Human Services, ex officio, or the Secretary’s designee;
(6) the Secretary of Disabilities, ex officio, or the Secretary’s designee;
(7) the Adjutant General of the Military Department, ex officio, or the
Adjutant General’s designee;
(8) one representative of each of the following organizations, appointed by
the Governor:
(i) a veterans service organization;

HOUSE BILL 270
(ii) a nonprofit organization that serves veterans; and
(iii) the business community;
(9) AS AN EX OFFICIO TRUSTEE, a member of the House of Delegates
appointed by the Speaker of the House; and
(10) AS AN EX OFFICIO TRUSTEE, a member of the Senate appointed by the
President of the Senate.
9–914.1.
(a) The Board shall meet at places and dates to be determined by the Board, but
not less than 2 times a year.
(b) A majority of the VOTING trustees is a quorum.
(c) A trustee:
(1) may not receive compensation as a trustee; but
(2) is entitled to reimbursement for expenses under the Standard State
Travel Regulations, as provided in the State budget.
(d) The Department shall provide staff, supplies, and office space for the Board.
9–917.
(a) (1) The Commission consists of the following members appointed by the
Governor.
(2) Of the members:
(i) 1 shall be appointed from each of the 8 congressional districts in
the State;
(ii) 1 shall be a veteran appointed from the State at large;
(iii) 1 shall be a woman veteran appointed from the State at large;
(iv) 1 shall be a representative of a retired enlisted organization;
(v) 1 shall be a veteran of the Iraq or Afghanistan conflict, as defined
in § 1–202(a–1) of the Public Safety Article; AND

HOUSE BILL 270 5
(vi) 1 shall be appointed from a list of individuals submitted to the
Governor by each of the following organizations:
1. [the American Ex–Prisoners of War, Inc.;
2.] the American Legion;
[3.] 2. the AMVETS;
[4.] 3. the Catholic War Veterans;
[5.] 4. the Disabled American Veterans;
[6.] 5. the Fleet Reserve Association;
[7.] 6. the Jewish War Veterans;
[8.] 7. the Marine Corps League;
[9.] 8. the Maryland Military Officers Association of America;
[10.] 9. the Military Order of the Purple Heart;
[11. the Polish Legion of American Veterans;
12.] 10. the Veterans of Foreign Wars;
[13.] 11. the Vietnam Veterans of America;
[14.] 12. the Korean War Veterans Association, Inc.;
[15.] 13. the National Association for Black Veterans;
[16.] 14. the Colonial Chapter of the Paralyzed Veterans of
America; [and]
[17.] 15. the Reserve Organization of America; and
16. AN ORGANIZATION REPRESENTING MILITARY
FAMILIES.
[(vii) 1 shall be an honorary nonvoting member appointed from a list
of individuals submitted to the Governor by the Pearl Harbor Survivors Association.]
(b) Each member must be a resident of the State and a veteran.

HOUSE BILL 270
(c) (1) The term of an appointed member is 5 years.
(2) The terms of the appointed members are staggered as required by the
terms provided for members of the Commission on October 1, 1984.
(3) At the end of a term, a member continues to serve until a successor is
appointed and qualifies.
(4) A member who is appointed after a term has begun serves only for the
rest of the term and until a successor is appointed and qualifies.
(5) When an organization is no longer a part of the Commission, the
appointment shall terminate at the end of the current member’s term.
(6) AN ORGANIZATION’S REPRESENTATIVE SEAT MAY BE REMOVED IF
THE ORGANIZATION FAILS TO APPOINT A NEW COMMISSIONER FOR 2 CONTINUOUS
YEARS.
(7) AN ORGANIZATION MAY BE REMOVED FROM THE COMMISSION IF
A REPRESENTATIVE FROM THE ORGANIZATION IS NOT RECOMMENDED BY THAT
ORGANIZATION.
[(d) A new organization may not be eligible for representation on the Commission,
by appointment of the Governor, unless it is congressionally chartered.]
9–918.
(a) From among the members of the Commission, the Governor shall appoint a
[chairman] CHAIR.
(b) A vice [chairman] CHAIR shall be elected by a simple majority vote of the
Commission.
9–926.
(a) From among its members, the Veterans’ Home Commission shall elect a
[chairman] CHAIR, a secretary, and any other officers that the Commission considers
appropriate.
9–927.
(b) (1) The Veterans’ Home Commission shall meet:
(i) at least twice a year, at the times and places that it determines;
and

HOUSE BILL 270 7
(ii) at the call of the [Chairman] CHAIR, on the [Chairman’s]
CHAIR’S initiative or on the request of at least 4 members.
9–935.
(a) From among its members, the Commission may elect:
(1) a [chairman] CHAIR;
(2) a vice [chairman] CHAIR; and
(3) a secretary and a treasurer or a secretary–treasurer.
9–2701.
(b) There is a Maryland Youth Advisory Council.
(c) (1) The Council consists of:
(i) four youths appointed by the President of the Senate;
(ii) four youths appointed by the Speaker of the House of Delegates;
(iii) four youths appointed by the Governor; and
(iv) the following members appointed by the Governor’s Office for
Children:
1. four youths nominated by the local management boards
established under § 8–301 of the Human Services Article;
2. four youths nominated by the Maryland Association of
Student Councils;
3. two youths nominated by the University System of
Maryland Student Council; [and]
4. the following youths nominated by the Student Advisory
Council to the Maryland Higher Education Commission:
A. one youth who is enrolled in a community college; and
B. one youth who is enrolled in a private college or university;
AND

HOUSE BILL 270
5. ONE YOUTH WHO HAS AN IMMEDIATE FAMILY
MEMBER WHO IS A SERVICE MEMBER, APPOINTED BY THE DEPARTMENT OF
VETERANS AND MILITARY FAMILIES.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.